Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 2. Jurisdiction.

Sec. 25.25.201.
Bases for jurisdiction over nonresident.

In a proceeding to establish or enforce a support order or to determine parentage of a child, a tribunal of this state may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual or the individual’s guardian or conservator if

the individual is personally served with a citation, summons, or notice within this state;

the individual submits to the jurisdiction of this state by consent in a record, by entering a general appearance, or by filing a responsive document having the effect of waiving any contest to personal jurisdiction;

the individual resided with the child in this state;

the individual resided in this state and provided prenatal expenses or support for the child;

the child resides in this state as a result of the acts or directives of the individual;

the individual engaged in sexual intercourse in this state and the child may have been conceived by that act of intercourse;

the individual acknowledged parentage of a child in a writing deposited with the Bureau of Vital Statistics under AS

25.20.050

; or

there is another basis consistent with the constitutions of this state and the United States for the exercise of personal jurisdiction.

The bases of personal jurisdiction set out in (a) of this section or in any other law of this state may not be used to acquire personal jurisdiction for a tribunal of this state to modify a child support order of another state unless the requirements of AS

25.25.611

are met or, in the case of a foreign support order, unless the requirements of AS

25.25.615

are met.

History.

(§ 5 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 22, 23 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “establish or enforce a support order or to determine parentage of a child” for “establish, enforce, or modify a support order or to determine parentage” in the introductory language, added “in a record” in (a)(2), added “of a child” in (a)(7); added (b).

Sec. 25.25.202.
Duration of personal jurisdiction.

Personal jurisdiction acquired by a tribunal of this state in a proceeding under this chapter or other law of this state relating to a support order continues as long as a tribunal of this state has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify its order or continuing jurisdiction to enforce its order as provided by AS

25.25.205

,

25.25.206

, and

25.25.281

.

History.

(§ 24 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, repealed and reenacted the section.

Sec. 25.25.203.
Initiating and responding tribunal of this state.

Under this chapter, a tribunal of this state may serve as an initiating tribunal to forward proceedings to a tribunal of another state and as a responding tribunal for proceedings initiated in another state or a foreign country.

History.

(§ 5 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 25 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added “a tribunal of” and “or a foreign country.”

Sec. 25.25.204.
Simultaneous proceedings.

A tribunal of this state may exercise jurisdiction to establish a support order if the complaint or comparable pleading is filed after a complaint or comparable pleading is filed in another state or a foreign country only if

the complaint or comparable pleading in this state is filed before the expiration of the time allowed in the other state or the foreign country for filing a responsive pleading challenging the exercise of jurisdiction by the other state or the foreign country;

the contesting party timely challenges the exercise of jurisdiction in the other state or the foreign country; and

if relevant, this state is the home state of the child.

A tribunal of this state may not exercise jurisdiction to establish a support order if the complaint or comparable pleading is filed before a complaint or comparable pleading is filed in another state or a foreign country if

the complaint or comparable pleading in the other state or the foreign country is filed before the expiration of the time allowed in this state for filing a responsive pleading challenging the exercise of jurisdiction by this state;

the contesting party timely challenges the exercise of jurisdiction in this state; and

if relevant, the other state or the foreign country is the home state of the child.

History.

(§ 5 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 26 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, deleted “in another state” at the end of the section heading, added “or a foreign country” in the introductory language of (a) and (b), added “or the foreign country” twice in (a)(1), in (a)(2), (b)(1) and (b)(3).

Sec. 25.25.205.
Continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify child support order.

A tribunal of this state that has issued a child support order consistent with the law of this state has and shall exercise continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify its child support order if the order is the controlling order and,

at the time of the filing of a request for modification, this state is the residence of the obligor, the individual obligee, or the child for whose benefit the support order is issued; or

even if this state is not the residence of the obligor, the individual obligee, or the child for whose benefit the support order is issued, the parties consent in a record or in open court that the tribunal of this state may continue to exercise jurisdiction to modify its order.

A tribunal of this state that has issued a child support order consistent with the law of this state may not exercise continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the order if

all of the parties who are individuals file consent in a record with the tribunal of this state that a tribunal of another state that has jurisdiction over at least one of the parties who is an individual or that is located in the state of residence of the child may modify the order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction; or

the tribunal’s order is not the controlling order.

If a tribunal of another state has issued a child support order under this chapter or a law substantially similar to this chapter that modifies a child support order of a tribunal of this state, a tribunal of this state shall recognize the continuing, exclusive jurisdiction of the tribunal of the other state.

A tribunal of this state that lacks continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify a child support order may serve as an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to modify a support order issued in that state.

A temporary support order issued ex parte or pending resolution of a jurisdictional conflict does not create continuing, exclusive jurisdiction in the issuing tribunal.

[Repealed, § 32 ch 102 SLA 2015.]

History.

(§ 5 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 27 — 30, 102 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (a) and (b), which read, “(a) A tribunal of this state issuing a support order consistent with the law of this state has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a child support order (1) as long as this state remains the residence of the obligor, the individual obligee, or the child for whose benefit the support order is issued; or (2) until each individual party has filed written consent with the tribunal of this state for a tribunal of another state to modify the order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction. (b) A tribunal of this state issuing a child support order consistent with the law of this state may not exercise its continuing jurisdiction to modify the order if the order has been modified by a tribunal of another state under a law substantially similar to this chapter.”, repealed and reenacted (c) and (d), repealed (f).

Sec. 25.25.206.
Continuing jurisdiction to enforce child support order.

A tribunal of this state that has issued a child support order consistent with the laws of this state may serve as an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce

the order if the order is the controlling order and has not been modified by a tribunal of another state that assumed jurisdiction under this chapter; or

a money judgment for arrears of support and interest on the order accrued before a determination that an order of a tribunal of another state is the controlling order.

A tribunal of this state having continuing jurisdiction over a support order may act as a responding tribunal to enforce the order.

[Repealed, § 32 ch 102 SLA 2015.]

History.

(§ 5 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 31, 32, 102 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (a) and (b), which read, “(a) A tribunal of this state may serve as an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce or modify a support order issued in that state. (b) A tribunal of this state having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a support order may act as a responding tribunal to enforce or modify the order. If a party subject to the continuing, exclusive jurisdiction of the tribunal no longer resides in the issuing state, in subsequent proceedings the tribunal may apply AS

25.25.316

to receive evidence from another state and AS

25.25.318

to obtain discovery through a tribunal of another state.”, repealed (c).

Sec. 25.25.207.
Determination of controlling child support order.

If a proceeding is brought under this chapter and only one tribunal has issued a child support order, the order of that tribunal is controlling and shall be recognized.

If a proceeding is brought under this chapter and two or more child support orders have been issued by tribunals of this state, another state, or a foreign country with regard to the same obligor and same child, a tribunal of this state having personal jurisdiction over both the obligor and individual obligee shall apply the following rules and shall determine, by order, which order controls and must be recognized:

if only one of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the order of that tribunal is controlling and shall be recognized;

if more than one of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter,

an order issued by a tribunal in the current home state of the child controls; or

if an order has not been issued in the current home state of the child, the order most recently issued controls;

if none of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the tribunal of this state shall issue a child support order, which controls.

If two or more child support orders have been issued for the same obligor and same child, upon request of a party who is an individual or that is a support enforcement agency, a tribunal of this state having personal jurisdiction over both the obligor and the obligee who is an individual shall determine which order controls under (b) of this section. The request may be filed with a registration for enforcement or a registration for modification under AS

25.25.601

—

25.25.616

or may be filed as a separate proceeding.

The tribunal that issued the controlling order under (a), (b), or (c) of this section has continuing jurisdiction to the extent provided in AS

25.25.205

or

25.25.206

.

A tribunal of this state that determines, by order, which is the controlling child support order under (b)(1) or (2) or (c) of this section, or that issues a new controlling child support order under (b)(3) of this section, shall include in that order

the basis upon which the tribunal made its determination;

the amount of prospective support, if any; and

the total amount of consolidated arrears and accrued interest, if any, under all of the orders after all payments made are credited as provided by AS

25.25.209

.

Within 30 days after issuance of the order determining which is the controlling order, the party obtaining that order shall file a certified copy of that order in each tribunal that had issued or registered an earlier order of child support. Failure of the party or the support enforcement agency obtaining the order to file a certified copy as required under this subsection subjects that party to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file arises, but that failure has no effect on the validity or enforceability of the controlling order.

A request to determine which is the controlling order must be accompanied by a copy of every child support order in effect and the applicable record of payments. The requesting party shall give notice of the request to each party whose rights may be affected by the determination.

An order that has been determined to be the controlling order, or a judgment for consolidated arrears of support and interest, if any, made under this section must be recognized in proceedings under this chapter.

History.

(§ 5 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 51 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 33 — 38 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (b), which read, “If a proceeding is brought under this chapter and two or more child support orders have been issued by tribunals of this state or another state with regard to the same obligor and child, a tribunal of this state shall apply the following rules in determining which order to recognize for purposes of continuing, exclusive jurisdiction: (1) if only one of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the order of that tribunal is controlling and shall be recognized; (2) if more than one of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, an order issued by a tribunal in the current home state of the child shall be recognized, but, if an order has not been issued in the current home state of the child, the order most recently issued is controlling and shall be recognized; (3) if none of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under this chapter, the tribunal of this state having jurisdiction over the parties shall issue a child support order, which is controlling and shall be recognized”; rewrote (c), which read, “If two or more child support orders have been issued for the same obligor and child and if the obligor or the individual obligee resides in this state, a party may request a tribunal of this state to determine which order controls and shall be recognized under (b) of this section. The request shall be accompanied by a certified copy of every support order in effect. Every party whose rights may be affected by a determination of the controlling order shall be given notice of the request for that determination”; rewrote (d), which read, “The tribunal that issued the order that shall be recognized as controlling under (a), (b), or (c) of this section is the tribunal that has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction in accordance with AS

25.25.205

”; in (e), in the introductory language, substituted “, which is” for “the identity of”, and inserted “or (c)” following “(b)(1) or (2)”, added (c)(1) and (c)(2), and made related and stylistic changes; in (f), substituted “which is” for “the identity of”, inserted “or the support enforcement agency” following “Failure of the party”, and made a stylistic change; added (g) and (h).

Sec. 25.25.208.
Child support orders for two or more obligees.

In responding to registrations or complaints for enforcement of two or more child support orders in effect at the same time with regard to the same obligor and different individual obligees, when at least one of the orders was issued by a tribunal of another state or a foreign country, a tribunal of this state shall enforce those orders in the same manner as if the orders had been issued by a tribunal of this state.

History.

(§ 5 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 39 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Child support orders” for “Multiple child support orders” in the section heading, deleted “multiple” after “In responding to” and after “same manner as if the”, added “or a foreign country”.

Sec. 25.25.209.
Credit for payments.

A tribunal of this state shall credit amounts collected for a particular period under any child support order against the amounts owed for the same period under any other child support order for support of the same child issued by a tribunal of this state, another state, or a foreign country.

History.

(§ 5 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 40 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the section, which read, “Amounts collected and credited for a particular period under a support order issued by a tribunal of another state shall be credited against the amounts accruing or accrued for the same period under a support order issued by the tribunal of this state.”

Secs. 25.25.210 — 25.25.270.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 57 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 25.25.280.
Application of this chapter to nonresident subject to personal jurisdiction.

A tribunal of this state exercising personal jurisdiction over a nonresident in a proceeding under this chapter, under other law of this state relating to a support order, or recognizing a foreign support order may receive evidence from outside this state under AS

25.25.316

, communicate with a tribunal outside this state under AS

25.25.317

, and obtain discovery through a tribunal outside this state under AS

25.25.318

. In all other respects, AS

25.25.301

—

25.25.616

do not apply, and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of this state.

History.

(§ 41 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 107, ch. 32, SLA 2015 makes this section effective July 1, 2015.

Sec. 25.25.281.
Continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify spousal support order.

A tribunal of this state issuing a spousal support order consistent with the law of this state has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the spousal support order throughout the existence of the support obligation.

A tribunal of this state may not modify a spousal support order issued by a tribunal of another state or a foreign country having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over that order under the law of that state or foreign country.

A tribunal of this state that has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a spousal support order may serve as

an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce the spousal support order issued in this state; or

a responding tribunal to enforce or modify its own spousal support order.

History.

(§ 41 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 107, ch. 32, SLA 2015 makes this section effective July 1, 2015.